California, session 20252026, AB40.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) The West Oakland community has a high cumulative air pollution exposure burden, a significant number of sensitive receptors, and includes census tracts that have been designated as disadvantaged communities. West Oakland is impacted by mobile sources of pollution, including diesel trucks and buses, and pollution from industry operations and adjacent Interstates 580, 980, and 880.(b) West Oakland was selected as a first-year priority community under the Community Air Protection Program pursuant to Assembly Bill 617 (Chapter 136 of the Statutes of 2017).(c) West Oakland residents are predominantly people of color, and the life expectancy for an African American child born and raised in West Oakland is at least 15 years fewer than for a white child born and raised in wealthier Oakland neighborhoods.(d) The State Air Resources Board funded peer-reviewed research that identified significant increases in fine particulate matter (PM2.5) in California due to passing coal-carrying trains and found that trains with empty coal cars also generated increases in PM2.5.(e) Coal train pollution has significant health effects that disproportionately impact communities of color and low-income individuals.(f) The United States Environmental Protection Agency found that PM2.5 poses the greatest risk to health of particulate matter pollutants.SEC. 2. Section 21080.52 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:21080.52. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, a public agency with a discretionary approval over any portion of a new project, or material expansion of an existing project, project with a design capacity exceeding 5,000,000 short tons per year of coal handling, storage, or export shall prepare or cause to be prepared an environmental impact report pursuant to this division.(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, a Independent of the conditions for a subsequent environmental impact report set forth in Section 21166 and guidelines adopted pursuant to Section 21083, a subsequent or supplemental environmental impact report shall be required for a project described in subdivision (a) if any of the following apply:(1) There is a change in the type or rank of coal handled, stored, or exported.(2) There is a significant change increase in the quantity of coal handled, stored, or exported.(3) There is an increase in the design capacity of a project so that the total amount of coal handled, stored, or exported exceeds 5,000,000 short tons per year.(3)(4) The environmental impact report for a project with a design capacity exceeding 5,000,000 short tons per year of coal handling, storage, or export is 10 or more years old.(c) If an environmental impact report prepared pursuant to this section identifies significant air quality impacts, a lead agency shall not certify the environmental impact report unless the project proponent demonstrates enforceable mitigation measures to reduce fine and coarse pollutants to within the threshold limit set by the lead agency. fully mitigates PM2.5 and PM10 fugitive dust emissions.SEC. 3. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because a local agency or school district has the authority to levy service charges, fees, or assessments sufficient to pay for the program or level of service mandated by this act, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code.